Hawaii statutes.
§431:9-235.5 Suspension or denial of
license for noncompliance with support order. In addition to any other
acts or conditions provided by law, the commissioner shall refuse to renew,
reinstate, or restore, or shall deny or suspend any license if the commissioner
has received certification from the child support enforcement agency pursuant
to the terms of section 576D-13 that the licensee or applicant is not in
compliance with an order of support or has failed to comply with a subpoena or
warrant relating to a paternity or child support proceeding. Unless otherwise
provided by law, following receipt of certification pursuant to this section,
the commissioner shall renew, reinstate, restore, or grant the license only
upon receipt of an authorization from the child support enforcement agency,
office of child support hearings, or the family court. Sections 92-17,
431:9-235, 431:9-237, 431:9-238, 431:9-239, and 431:9-240 shall not apply to a
refusal to renew, reinstate, or restore a license or to a license suspension or
denial pursuant to this section. [L 1997, c 293, §2; am L 2006, c 154, §20]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next